Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3209.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216B.2422, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Resource plan filing and approval. (a) A utility shall file a resource plan with the commission periodically in accordance with rules adopted by the commission. The commission shall approve, reject, or modify the plan of a public utility, as defined in section 216B.02, subdivision 4, consistent with the public interest. (b) In the resource plan proceedings of all other utilities, the commission's order shall be advisory and the order's findings and conclusions shall constitute prima facie evidence which may be rebutted by substantial evidence in all other proceedings. With respect to utilities other than those defined in section 216B.02, subdivision 4, the commission shall consider the filing requirements and decisions in any comparable proceedings in another jurisdiction. (c) As a part of its resource plan filing, a utility shall include the least cost plan for meeting 50 and 75 percent of all energy needs from both new and refurbished generating facilities through a combination of conservation and renewable energy resources. new text begin (d) A public utility must include in an integrated resource plan filing an estimate of (1) the reduction in the public utility's winter and summer system peak attributable to implementing a virtual power plant program approved under section 216B.2429, and (2) the cost of the virtual power plant program. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [216B.2429] VIRTUAL POWER PLANT TARIFF AND PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Aggregator" means an entity that enters into a power purchase agreement to provide to a public utility electricity that is aggregated from eligible technology devices owned by utility customers enrolled in a virtual power plant program. new text end new text begin (c) "Demand response measure" has the meaning given to "load management" in section 216B.2402. new text end new text begin (d) "Device" means a piece of equipment that is an eligible technology owned by a participant. new text end new text begin (e) "Distributed energy resource" means an eligible technology device that generates electricity and whose capacity does not exceed ten megawatts. new text end new text begin (f) "Eligible technology" means technology that is capable of being activated or dispatched under a virtual power plant program in order to address a grid event. Eligible technology includes but is not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) solar photovoltaic devices; new text end new text begin (2) energy storage systems; new text end new text begin (3) electric vehicles; new text end new text begin (4) smart thermostats; new text end new text begin (5) heat pumps; and new text end new text begin (6) demand response measures. new text end new text begin (g) "Energy storage system" has the meaning given in section 216B.2422, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin (h) "Greenhouse gas" means atmospheric emissions of carbon dioxide, methane, nitrous oxide, hydrofluorocarbons, perfluorocarbons, or sulfur hexafluoride. new text end new text begin (i) "Grid event" means a shortage of electricity supply that may be addressed by the dispatch or activation of devices enrolled in a virtual power plant program. new text end new text begin (j) "Grid system" means a public utility's interconnected network of electricity generators and transmission and distribution lines that deliver electricity to ultimate consumers. new text end new text begin (k) "Participant" means an owner of an eligible technology device enrolled in a virtual power plant program. new text end new text begin (l) "Peaker plant" means a power plant that operates to supplement electricity supply for short periods only during a system peak. new text end new text begin (m) "Performance-based compensation" means a system of payments made to participants and aggregators based on the value of the electricity dispatched or saved through activating demand response measures during a grid event. new text end new text begin (n) "Smart thermostat" means a thermostat that can be controlled remotely via the Internet. new text end new text begin (o) "Solar photovoltaic device" has the meaning given in section 216C.06, subdivision 16. new text end new text begin (p) "System peak" means the period of time during which electricity demand on a grid system is highest. new text end new text begin (q) "Virtual power plant program" means a program that aggregates electricity from distributed energy resources and activates demand response measures to address grid events. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Required filing; objectives; review. new text end new text begin No later than ......., 2026, each public utility must file with the commission a virtual power plant tariff and program that are consistent with the requirements of this section and designed to achieve the following goals: new text end new text begin (1) reduce demand for grid-supplied electricity during system peaks; new text end new text begin (2) make renewable energy generated during off-peak periods available for use during system peaks; new text end new text begin (3) lower ratepayer bills by reducing utility market purchases at elevated prices during system peaks; new text end new text begin (4) reduce emissions of greenhouse gases and other air pollutants; new text end new text begin (5) optimize the use of existing generation and energy storage assets; new text end new text begin (6) improve the resiliency and reliability of the grid system; new text end new text begin (7) avoid or defer the construction of electric generation, distribution, or transmission infrastructure; and new text end new text begin (8) reduce the use of fossil-fuel-fired peaker plants. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Content of tariff. new text end new text begin (a) A virtual power plant tariff and program filed under this section must contain, at a minimum: new text end new text begin (1) a description of the goals of the virtual power plant program and the role the program plays in meeting the public utility's grid system needs; new text end new text begin (2) provisions to enroll and manage participants by aggregators and, if applicable, by the public utility directly; new text end new text begin (3) provisions to operate a virtual power plant program, including how the public utility communicates with aggregators and participants during a grid event; and new text end new text begin (4) provisions that, notwithstanding section 216B.164, participants must be compensated at the applicable rate established under the tariff for electricity exported to the public utility or demand reductions made during a grid event. new text end new text begin (b) The commission may require a virtual power plant tariff and program filed under this section to contain: new text end new text begin (1) provisions that describe how: new text end new text begin (i) performance measurement and performance verification data are delivered to the public utility; new text end new text begin (ii) performance-based compensation payments are calculated and issued by the public utility; and new text end new text begin (iii) disputes regarding performance-based compensation are settled; new text end new text begin (2) descriptions regarding how performance-based compensation is designed to reflect the full value of services at the specific locations where an eligible technology is utilized. The value must include, at a minimum: new text end new text begin (i) local and system peak demand reduction; and new text end new text begin (ii) avoiding or deferring transmission or distribution system upgrades or capacity expansion; new text end new text begin (3) provisions that prohibit a participant from being compensated for providing the same energy resources more than once; new text end new text begin (4) provisions to measure and verify energy storage system performance directly at the site of the energy storage system without requiring the installation of an additional meter; and new text end new text begin (5) operational parameters describing: new text end new text begin (i) the minimum and maximum numbers of annual grid events during which the public utility may dispatch or activate enrolled resources; new text end new text begin (ii) the months of the year during which grid events may occur; new text end new text begin (iii) the days of the week during which grid events may occur; new text end new text begin (iv) the times of the day during which grid events may occur; new text end new text begin (v) the maximum duration of grid events; and new text end new text begin (vi) the minimum advance notification of grid events to participants; and new text end new text begin (6) any other information the commission determines is necessary to efficiently operate a virtual power plant program. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Other operational requirements. new text end new text begin (a) An aggregator must enter into a power purchase agreement with a public utility in order to participate in a virtual power plant program. new text end new text begin (b) A public utility may serve as an aggregator. new text end new text begin (c) A public utility customer may enroll with an aggregator to participate in a virtual power plant program at the time the customer's distributed energy resource begins operations. new text end new text begin (d) A participant must not be excluded from enrollment in a virtual power plant program as a result of receiving financial incentives from the public utility for energy, capacity, or other grid services under other programs offered by the public utility. new text end new text begin (e) A public utility must not require collateral from a participant or aggregator as a requirement to participate in a virtual power plant program. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Commission duties. new text end new text begin (a) The commission may (1) approve, reject, or modify a virtual power plant tariff filed under this section, and (2) modify an approved tariff after notice and hearing. new text end new text begin (b) The commission must establish reasonable and appropriate standards to protect the interests of virtual power plant program participants. The standards may include requirements for registration forms, standard contract terms and conditions, payment terms, warranties, disclosure forms, and other requirements. new text end new text begin (c) The commission must establish standards and procedures governing energy data held by participants and public utilities that must be shared with aggregators in order to ensure a virtual power plant program's efficient operation. An aggregator must not sell or use, for any other purpose, data from participants or public utilities gathered for virtual power plant program use. new text end new text begin (d) The commission may establish financial performance incentives for public utilities that achieve the system peak reduction targets under subdivision 6. new text end new text begin (e) The commission must develop a process to amend performance-based compensation rates to use when amending performance-based compensation rates is warranted. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin System peak reduction targets. new text end new text begin No later than 2028, a public utility, by implementing a virtual power plan and other programs designed to reduce the public utility's system peak energy demand, must reduce the public utility's winter and summer peaks by at least ten percent from the base year 2025. The commission must establish new targets for subsequent years, provided the targets are cost effective. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Modification or delay. new text end new text begin The commission may modify or delay a virtual power plant program's implementation if the commission determines doing so is in the public interest. When making a determination under this subdivision, the commission must consider whether the system peak reduction targets established under subdivision 6 are technically and economically feasible. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Cost recovery. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the commission may approve cost recovery under section 216B.16, including an appropriate rate of return, for any prudent and reasonable investments made or expenses incurred by a public utility to administer and implement a virtual power plant program approved by the commission under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin Beginning January 31, 2028, and each January 31 thereafter, a public utility must file an annual report to the commission and to the chairs and ranking minority members of the senate and house of representatives committees with primary jurisdiction over energy policy. The report must include, at a minimum: new text end new text begin (1) the total capacity enrolled under the tariff approved by the commission under this section, reported separately by eligible technology type, customer class, and whether the participant operated under an aggregator or directly through the public utility; new text end new text begin (2) the system peak reduction attributable to the virtual power plant program; new text end new text begin (3) contributions to other grid services made by the virtual power plant program; new text end new text begin (4) recommendations to increase participation in the virtual power plant program; and new text end new text begin (5) other information requested by the commission. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end